Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-4021
Grain Sorghum National Checkoff Fund; created; use; investment.

The Grain Sorghum National Checkoff Fund is created. The fund shall be administered by the Grain Sorghum Development, Utilization, and Marketing Board. All sums of money received from the United Sorghum Checkoff Program shall be deposited in the fund. The board shall expend the fund to conduct state-specific programs for research, information, and promotion related to grain sorghum. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2019, LB298, § 23.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.